src/closed-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON muhtemcase
 +Attr: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Attr: NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:is K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
LEXICON juogacase
 +Sg+Nom:ga K ;
 +Sg+Nom:ga NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Gen:nga K ;
 +Sg+Acc:jddá K ;
 +Sg+Acc:jddáv K ; !Variant
 +Sg+Ill:sik K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:sstá K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:nna K ;
 +Sg+Ine:nne K ;
 +Sg+Com:jnak K ;
 +Ess:nin K ;
 
! Spiik:
! gájkka, se divna.
! Divna Böjes i predikativ ställning som adjektiv, utom i ack sg som 
! oftast är lika med nominativ
 
LEXICON gájkacase
     NAMÁK ;
 :ka NAMÁK ;
 +Attr:ka K ;
 +Sg+Nom:ka K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Acc:ka K ; ! Alternate
 +Sg+Ill:kaj K ;
 +Sg+Ine:an K ;
 +Sg+Ela:as K ;
 +Sg+Com:ajn K ;
 +Ess:kan K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ajt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K ; 
 +Pl+Ela:ajs K ; 
 +Pl+Ine:ajn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ajn K ;
 
LEXICON goappátjagácase
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 
LEXICON goabbákcase
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:is K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
LEXICON ienebusjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ttja K ;
 +Sg+Acc:ttjav K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dtjaj K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ttjas K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:ttjan K ;
 +Sg+Com:ttjajn K ;
 +Ess:dtjan K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ttja K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ttjaj K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ttjajt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ttajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ttjajn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ttjajs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ttjaj K ;
 
LEXICON ienemuscase
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:á K ;
 +Sg+Acc:áv K ;
 +Sg+Ill:saj K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ás K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:án K ;
 +Sg+Com:ájn K ;
 +Ess:san K ;
 +Pl+Nom:á K ;
 +Pl+Gen:áj K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ájt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ájda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ájn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ájs K ;
 +Pl+Com:áj K ;
 
LEXICON enapcase
 +Sg+Nom:p K ;
 +Sg+Gen:bu K ;
 +Sg+Acc:buv K ;
 +Sg+Ill:buj K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:bus K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:bun K ;
 +Sg+Com:bujn K ;
 +Ess:bun K ;
 +Pl+Nom:bu K ;
 +Pl+Gen:buj K ;
 +Pl+Acc:bujt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:bujda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:bujn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:bujs K ;
 +Pl+Com:buj K ;
 
LEXICON juohkkahasjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ttja K ;
 +Sg+Acc:ttjav K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dtjaj K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ttjas K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:ttjan K ;
 +Sg+Com:ttjajn K ;
 +Ess:dtjan K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ttja K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ttjaj K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ttjajt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ttjajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ttjajn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ttjajs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ttjaj K ;
 
LEXICON nubbecase
 +Sg+Gen:e K ;
 +Sg+Acc:ev K ;
 +Sg+Ela:es K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:en K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:e K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;

LEXICON juobbácase
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 
LEXICON máŋŋgacase
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Part:t K ;

LEXICON gallicase
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;


LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:0 K ;




! Subjunction
! ===========

LEXICON Subjunction
ahte	Cs ;
at	Cs ;
dade	Cs ;
danen	Cs ;
dasik	Cs ;
degu	Cs ;
dagu	Cs ; !XXX se degu
desik	Cs ;
gå	Cs ;
ihka	Cs ;
juhte	Cs ;
juhti Cs ;
jus	Cs ;
jut	Cs ;
made Cs ;
men	Cs ;
nåv% gåk	Cs ;
vaj		Cs ;
vaják  Cs ;
!valla	Cs ; CC only.
val    Cs ;
vájk	Cs ;
vájku	Cs ;
ájnat	Cs ;
sihke Cs ;
åvddål% gå Cs ;
åvddåla% gå Cs ;


LEXICON Cs 
+CS:0 # ;





! Conjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Conjunction

!de		Cc ; ! Pcle only, "så".
ja		Cc ;
jali		Cc ;
ge		Cc ;
goappátja	Cc ;
jalik		Cc ;
juogu		Cc ;
vaj		Cc ;
valla		Cc ;
val         Cc ;
vájbi		Cc ;
váj         Cc ;

LEXICON Cc
+CC:0 # ;




! Numerals
! ========



LEXICON Numeral					!^N^
MILIJÅVNNÅ ;          ! a noun of its own		!^N^
UNDERTUVSÁN ;      ! for generator under 1000	!^N^
JUSTTUVSÁN ;       ! going via 1000		!^N^
OVERTUVSÁN ;       ! for generator over 1000	!^N^
OLD ;             ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.	!^N^
!num-derived ;    ! still unimplemented		!^N^
num-imprecise ;   ! still almost unimplemented	!^N^
ARABIC ;          ! for the arabic numerals	!^C^
ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals	!^C^
NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.		!^C^
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.			!^C^

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILIJÅVNNÅ					!^N^
milijåvnnå:milijåvnnå AKTA ;			!^N^
millijåvnnå:millijåvnnå AKTA ;	!^N^
milijåvnåt+A+Ord:milijåvnåd3 VUOSTASJ ;	!^N^
millijåvnåt+A+Ord:millijåvnåd3 VUOSTASJ ;	!^N^
milliárdda:milliárdda AKTA ;		!^N^ ! Num or N?
milliárdat+A+Ord:milliárdad3 VUOSTASJ ;		!^N^

! Overtuvsán, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERTUVSÁN				!^N^
O-AKTAF ;     ! 1000				!^N^
O-2TO9F ;     ! 2000, 3000, ...			!^N^
O-JUSTLÅGEVF ; ! 10000				!^N^
O-2TO9LÅG;   ! 20000, 30000, ...		!^N^
O-LÅGENAN ;  ! 11000, 12000, ...		!^N^
O-TJUOHTE ;     ! 100000				!^N^	
O-2TO9TJUO ;   ! 200000, 300000, ...		!^N^

! All the child lexica of OVERTUVSÁN have the prefix O-.
! They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTTUVSÁN.


! Thousands

LEXICON O-AKTAF		!^N^
akta JUSTDUHÁT ;	!^N^
JUSTDUHÁT ;		!^N^

LEXICON O-X1000		!^N^
akta JUSTTUVSÁN ;	!^N^

LEXICON O-2TO9F			!^N^
guokta JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^	
gålmmå JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^
niellja JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^		
vihtta JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^
guhtta JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^
gietjav JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^
gáktsa JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^
aktse JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^


! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLÅGEVF		!^N^
lågev JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^
! This lexicon is for the number 10000 only. it is separated from the
! rest to avoid forms like *logivihttaduhát, etc.


LEXICON O-LÅGEVF			!^N^	     
låk JUSTTUVSÁN ;		!^N^ !XXXlong form too?
låk O-X1000 ;			!^N^ !XXXlong form too?
låk O-2TO9F ;			!^N^ !XXXlong form too?
! this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly 
! from OVERTUVSÁN. Thus, *logivihttaduhát, etc. is avoided.

LEXICON O-2TO9LÅG		!^N^	  
guokta O-LÅGEVF ;		!^N^
gålmmå O-LÅGEVF ;		!^N^
niellja O-LÅGEVF ;		!^N^
vihtta O-LÅGEVF ;		!^N^
guhtta O-LÅGEVF ;		!^N^
gietjav O-LÅGEVF ;			!^N^
gáktsa O-LÅGEVF ;		!^N^
aktse O-LÅGEVF ;			!^N^


! Teens of thousands

LEXICON O-LÅGENAN		!^N^
lågenan#akta JUSTTUVSÁN ;        !^N^
lågenan#guokta:lågenan#guokta JUSTTUVSÁN ;          !^N^ 
lågenan#gålmmå JUSTTUVSÁN ;       !^N^
lågenan#niellja:lågenan#niellja JUSTTUVSÁN ;      !^N^ 
lågenan#vihtta:lågenan#vihtta JUSTTUVSÁN ;             !^N^
lågenan#guhtta:lågenan#guhtta JUSTTUVSÁN ;         !^N^ 
lågenan#gietjav:lågenan#giehtjav JUSTTUVSÁN ;       !^N^ 
lågenan#gáktsa:lågenan#gáktsa JUSTTUVSÁN ;       !^N^
lågenan#aktse:lågenan#aktse JUSTTUVSÁN ;                 !^N^

akta O-NL ;        !^N^
guokta O-NL ;          !^N^ 
gålmmå O-NL ;       !^N^
niellja O-NL ;      !^N^ 
vihtta O-NL ;             !^N^
guhtta O-NL ;         !^N^ 
gietjav O-NL ;       !^N^ 
gáktsa O-NL ;       !^N^
aktse O-NL ;                 !^N^


 LEXICON O-NL			!^N^
 lågenan JUSTTUVSÁN ;	!^N^


! Hundreds of thousands

LEXICON O-TJUOHTE					!^N^
tjuohte JUSTTUVSÁN ;  ! 100000			!^N^
tjuohte O-X1000 ;     ! 101000			!^N^
tjuohte O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...	!^N^
tjuohte O-LÅGEVF ;    ! 110000, 113000, ...	!^N^
tjuohte O-2TO9LÅG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...	!^N^
tjuohte O-LÅGENAN ; ! 115000, ...		!^N^

LEXICON O-TJUODE					!^N^
tjuode JUSTTUVSÁN ;  ! 200000			!^N^
tjuode O-X1000 ;     ! 201000			!^N^
tjuode O-2TO9F ;    ! 202000, 203000, ...	!^N^
tjuode O-LÅGEVF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...	!^N^
tjuode O-2TO9LÅG ;  ! 220000, 223000, ...	!^N^
tjuode O-LÅGENAN ; ! 215000, ...		!^N^

LEXICON O-2TO9TJUO				!^N^
akta O-TJUOHTE ;       ! #one# hundred...		!^N^
guokta O-TJUODE ;				!^N^
gålmmå O-TJUODE ;				!^N^
niellja O-TJUODE ;				!^N^
vihtta O-TJUODE ;				!^N^
guhtta O-TJUODE ;				!^N^
gietjav O-TJUODE ;					!^N^
gáktsa O-TJUODE ;				!^N^
aktse O-TJUODE ;					!^N^

LEXICON Indefinite
muhtem+Pron+Indef:muhtem muhtemcase ;
muhtem+Pron+Indef:muhti goappátjagácase ;
nágin+Pron+Indef:nágin muhtemcase ;
juoga+Pron+Indef:juo juogacase ;
gájka+Pron+Indef:gájk gájkacase ;
goappátjagá+Pron+Indef:goappátjagá goappátjagácase ;
goabbák+Pron+Indef:goappág goabbákcase ;
ienebusj+Pron+Indef:ienebu ienebusjcase ;
ienemus+Pron+Indef:ienemus ienemuscase ;
enamus+Pron+Indef:enamus ienemuscase ;
enap+Pron+Indef:ena enapcase ;
ienep+Pron+Indef:iene enapcase ; 
hármmat+Pron+Indef:hármmad goabbákcase ;
juohkkahasj+Pron+Indef:juohkkaha juohkkahasjcase ;
moattes+Pron+Indef:moaddás goabbákcase ;
ålos+Pron+Indef:ållus goabbákcase ;
nubbe+Pron+Indef:nupp nubbecase ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef:juoppá juobbácase ;
gallegis+Pron+Indef:gallegis ienemuscase ;
gallegasj+Pron+Indef:gallega juohkkahasjcase ;
irda iind ;
divna iind ;
gájk#divna iind ;
sæbbmi iind ;
sæmmi iind ;
enas iind ;
ihkenis iind ;
åbbånis iind ;
åvvånis iind ;
sudes iind ;  
makkirak iind ;
makkárak iind ;
juonenik iind ;
juokkirik iind ;
juokkirak iind ;
juoppánik  iind ; !iness.
majduk iind ;
mahku iind ;
LEXICON LÅGENAN					!^N^
lågenan#nubbe+A+Ord:lågenan#nupp nubbecase ;		!^N^ 
